Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Chapter 33. Notaries Public

§ 25-33-1.
Appointment, bond and oath; issuance of new certificate; qualifications.

The Governor may appoint notaries public who may serve in any or all counties of this state. A notary public shall hold office for a term of four (4) years. Notaries public who are appointed and commissioned after July 1, 1988, shall give bond, with sufficient sureties, licensed by the Department of Insurance, in the penalty sum of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). All such bonds shall be conditioned and approved by the Secretary of State. Notaries public shall not otherwise be considered as state officers. Each notary public shall take the oath of office prescribed by Section 268 of the Constitution. A notary public shall qualify by filing the oath and bond in the Office of the Secretary of State.

The bond requirements, unexpired appointments and commissions of notaries public issued prior to July 1, 1988, shall be sufficient, regardless of any jurisdictional limitations, to authorize notaries public appointed and commissioned prior to July 1, 1988, to serve any or all counties of this state. Any notary public commission containing language limiting the jurisdiction of a notary public may be returned to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall then issue a new certificate indicating that such notary public may serve in any and all counties of this state.

The Secretary of State shall issue notary public commissions on behalf of the Governor to all qualified applicants. A notary public shall be at least eighteen (18) years of age, a citizen or legal resident of the United States, shall have resided in this state for a period of not less than thirty (30) days immediately preceding the date of the application, and shall meet such other requirements as the Secretary of State may establish by rule.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 426; 1892, § 3040; 1906, § 3447; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2780; 1930, § 2858; 1942, § 4016; Laws, 1904, ch. 159; Laws, 1926, ch. 190; Laws, 1981, ch. 426, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 456, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 427, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 25-33-3.
To procure seals; delivery of copy of seal provisions.

Every notary public appointed and commissioned shall, at his own expense, procure a suitable notarial seal. Each seal shall have the name of the county of the notary’s residence with that of the state and his own name on the margin thereof, and the words “notary public” across the center; and his official acts shall be attested by his seal of office.

The failure of such seal to conform to the provisions of this section shall not invalidate any official act or certificate of such notary public.

It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to have printed a suitable number of copies of this section and to deliver to each notary public hereafter appointed a copy at the time of the issuance of his commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3041; 1906, § 3448; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2781; 1930, § 2859; 1942, § 4017; Laws, 1928, ch. 24; Laws, 1981, ch. 426, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 456, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 25-33-5.
Register of official acts.

Every notary public shall keep a fair register of all his official acts, and shall give a certified copy of his record, or any part thereof, to any person applying for it and paying the legal fees therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 429; 1892, § 3042; 1906, § 3449; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2782; 1930, § 2860; 1942, § 4018.

§ 25-33-7.
Disposal of register and papers.

In the case of the death, resignation, disqualification or expiration of the term of office of any notary public, his registers and other public papers shall, within thirty (30) days, be lodged in the office of the clerk of the circuit court of the county of his residence; and the clerk of that county may maintain an action for them.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 430; 1892, § 3043; 1906, § 3450; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2783; 1930, § 2861; 1942, § 4019; Laws, 1981, ch. 426, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 456, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 25-33-9.
Administering oaths and affirmations; affidavit of notary public.

Every notary public shall have the power of administering oaths and affirmations in all matters incident to his notarial office, and he shall be further qualified and empowered to administer oaths and affirmations for the purpose of taking oral testimony under oath or affirmation within the state at large. If an attestation of a notary public is questioned as to its authenticity or correctness of language, the notary public may file an affidavit regarding the truth of the attestation in question along with any corrected language and may file such with the land records in the office of the Chancery Clerk where such land is located, properly indexed, if such authenticity or correctness of language affects real property. Such affidavit shall be a rebuttable presumption that the attestation is true and correct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 427; 1892, § 3044; 1906, § 3451; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2784; 1930, § 2862; 1942, § 4020; Laws, 1974, ch. 387; Laws, 2002, ch. 354, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 25-33-11.
Powers and duties.

Every notary public shall have power to receive the proof or acknowledgment of all instruments of writing relating to commerce or navigation, such as bills of sale, bottomries, mortgages, and hypothecations of ships, vessels or boats, charter parties of affreightment, letters of attorney, and such other writings as are commonly proved or acknowledged before notaries; and to perform all other duties required of notaries by commercial usage, and also to make declarations, including the filing of an affidavit as provided in Section 25-33-9, and certify the truth thereof, under his seal of office, concerning all matters done by him in virtue of his office.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 428; 1892, § 3045; 1906, § 3452; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2785; 1930, § 2863; 1942, § 4021; Laws, 1981, ch. 426, § 4; Laws, 1988, ch. 456, § 4; Laws, 2002, ch. 354, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 25-33-13.
Affixation of expiration date of commission.

Every notary public, holding commission as such through appointment by the governor, shall be required to affix to any written or printed certificate of acknowledgment by him, in addition to his official seal and signature, a written or printed recital of the date at which his commission expires. The failure of such notary public to affix such recital of date at which his commission expires shall not invalidate the acknowledgment of such instrument or such certificate of acknowledgment, or otherwise affect the validity or recording of any instrument.

In case of the failure hereafter on the part of any notary public, so holding commission, to comply with the requirement of this section, his commission may be revoked by the governor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4021-01; Laws, 1944, ch. 325, §§ 1, 2, eff May 1, 1944.

§ 25-33-15.
Record of protest of bill or note.

When any notary public, justice of the peace, or clerk shall protest any bill of exchange or promissory note, he shall make a full and true record in his register or book kept for that purpose of all his proceedings in relation thereto, and shall note thereon whether demand of the sum of money therein mentioned was made, of whom, when, and where; whether he presented such bill or note; whether notices were given, to whom, and in what manner; where the same was mailed, and when and to whom and where directed; and of every other fact touching the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 431; 1892, § 3046; 1906, § 3453; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2786; 1930, § 2864; 1942, § 4022.

§ 25-33-17.
Ex officio notaries public.

All justice court judges and clerks, clerks of the circuit and chancery courts and assistant secretaries of state are notaries public by virtue of their office, and shall possess all the powers and discharge all the duties belonging to the office of notary public, and may authenticate all their acts, instruments and attestations by the common seal of office; and all acts done by them of a notarial character shall receive the same credit and legal effect as are attached to the acts of notaries public.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 425; 1892, § 3047; 1906, § 3454; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2787; 1930, § 2865; 1942, § 4023; Laws, 1981, ch. 426, § 5; Laws, 1988, ch. 456, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 25-33-19.
Common seal of such officers.

The board of supervisors of every county shall provide a notarial seal, with the inscription “notary public” around the margin and the image of an eagle in the center, which seal shall be kept in the office of the clerk of the circuit court; and all ex-officio notaries public may at all times have access to and use such seal for the authentication of any notarial act necessary to be so authenticated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 432; 1892, § 3048; 1906, § 3455; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2788; 1930, § 2866; 1942, § 4024; Laws, 1988, ch. 456, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 25-33-21.
Acknowledgment by notary public as stockholder.

It shall be lawful for any notary public who is a stockholder, director, officer, or employee of a bank or other corporation to take the acknowledgment of any party to any written instrument to or by such corporation, or to administer an oath to any other stockholder, director, officer, employee, or agent of such corporation, or to protest for nonacceptance or nonpayment bills of exchange, drafts, checks, notes, and other negotiable instruments which may be owned or held for collection by such corporation; provided, it shall be unlawful for any notary public to take the acknowledgment of an instrument by or to a bank or other corporation of which he is a stockholder, director, officer, or employee, where such notary is a party to such instrument, either individually or as a representative of such corporation, or to protest any negotiable instrument owned or held for collection by such corporation, where such notary is individually a party to such instrument.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 2788a; 1930, § 2867; 1942, § 4025; Laws, 1918, ch. 227.

§ 25-33-23.
Notarial acts of commissioned officers of United States armed forces.

In addition to the acknowledgment of instruments and the performance of other notarial acts in the manner and form and as otherwise authorized by law, instruments may be acknowledged, documents attested, oaths and affirmations administered, depositions and affidavits executed, and other notarial acts performed before or by any commissioned officer in active service of the armed forces of the United States with the rank of second lieutenant or higher in the army or marine corps, or with the rank of ensign or higher in the navy or coast guard, or with equivalent rank in any other component part of the armed forces of the United States, by any person who either (a) is a member of the armed forces of the United States or the husband or wife of a member of the armed forces of the United States; or (b) is serving as a merchant seaman outside the limits of the United States included within the 48 states and the District of Columbia; or (c) is outside said limits by permission, assignment, or direction of any department or official of the United States government, in connection with any activity pertaining to the prosecution of any war in which the United States is then engaged.

Such acknowledgments of instruments, attestation of documents, administration of oaths and affirmations, executions of depositions and affidavits, and performance of other notarial acts, heretofore or hereafter made or taken, are hereby declared legal, valid, and binding, and instruments and documents so acknowledged, authenticated, or sworn to shall be admissible in evidence and eligible to record in this state under the same circumstances and with the same force and effect as if such acknowledgment, attestation, oath, affirmation, deposition, affidavit, or other notarial act had been made or taken within this state before or by a duly qualified officer or official as otherwise provided by law.

In the taking of acknowledgments and the performing of other notarial acts requiring certification, a certificate endorsed upon or attached to the instrument or documents, which shows the date of the notarial act and which states, in substance, that the person appearing before the officer acknowledged the instrument as his act or made or signed the instrument or document under oath, shall be sufficient for all intents and purposes. The instrument or document shall not be rendered invalid by the failure to state the place of execution or acknowledgment.

If the signature, rank, and branch of service or subdivision thereof, of any such commissioned officer appear upon such instrument or document or certificate, no further proof of the authority of such officer so to act shall be required, and such action by such commissioned officer shall be prima facie evidence that the person making such oath or acknowledgment is within the purview of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4025-01; Laws, 1946, ch 308; Laws, 1954, ch 247.

§ 25-33-25.
Notice that a notary public is not an attorney.

A notary public who is not an attorney licensed to practice law in this state and, who advertises in any language the person’s services as a notary public by radio, television, signs, pamphlets, newspapers, telephone directory or other written or oral communication, or in any other advertisement, shall include with such advertisement the notice set forth in this section in English and/or in any other languages used in the advertisement. The notice shall be of conspicuous size and shall state: “I AM NOT AN ATTORNEY LICENSED TO PRACTICE LAW IN THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI, AND I MAY NOT GIVE LEGAL ADVICE OR ACCEPT FEES FOR LEGAL ADVICE.”

An advertisement on radio or television must include substantially the same message.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 464, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 25-33-27.
Prohibited representations or advertising.

A notary public who is not an attorney licensed to practice law is prohibited from representing or advertising that the notary public is an immigration consultant, immigration paralegal or expert on immigration matters unless the notary public is an accredited representative of an organization recognized by the board of immigration appeals pursuant to 8 CFR Section 292.2(a-e) or any subsequent federal law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 464, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 25-33-29.
Exceptions.

The provisions of Sections 25-33-25 through 25-33-31 shall not apply to:

Notary services offered by a state or national bank, trust company, savings and loan association, savings bank or by any affiliate or subsidiary of such state or national bank, trust company, savings and loan association or savings bank or any agent or employee thereof; or

Any offering of notary services or listing of fees for notary services as a part of the closing of any loan transaction, extension of credit, security instrument or transfer of title.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 464, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 25-33-31.
Compliance.

Failure to comply with the provisions of Sections 25-33-25 through 25-33-29 constitutes an unfair or deceptive act as provided in Section 75-24-5.

Any person who knowingly and willfully violates any provision of Sections 25-33-25 through 25-33-29 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).

Upon a second conviction of any person under Sections 25-33-25 through 25-33-29, the offenses being committed within a period of five (5) years, the person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a period not to exceed one (1) year or a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

Upon a third or subsequent conviction of any person for a violation of Sections 25-33-25 through 25-33-29, the offenses being committed within a period of five (5) years, the person shall be guilty of a felony, and upon conviction shall be punished by confinement in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a period not to exceed five (5) years, or fined in an amount not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

Criminal convictions in other jurisdictions for violations of substantially similar provisions to those contained in Sections 25-33-25 through 25-33-29 shall be counted in computing whether a violation under Sections 25-33-25 through 25-33-29 is a first, second, third or subsequent offense.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 464, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 25-33-33.
Forms and fees not otherwise provided by law; regulations providing for suspension or revocation of notary commission for misfeasance or malfeasance in office.

The Secretary of State may prescribe forms and establish fees for services not otherwise provided by law.

Pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Law, the Secretary of State shall issue rules to implement this chapter including regulations providing for the suspension or revocation of a notary commission for misfeasance or malfeasance in office.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 427, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2007.